California statutes. Education Code
(2) Whether there are existing pipelines, planned pipelines, or easements for pipelines on, or in proximity to, as specified pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 17251, the schoolsite, including the location of the pipeline, the age of the pipeline, the pipeline material, the class of pipeline, the diameter of the pipeline, the depth at which the pipeline is buried, the wall thickness of the pipeline, the product or products transported by the pipeline, the operating pressure of the pipeline, the history of spills or leaks of material being transported by the pipeline, as reported to a governmental agency, and the location of the shutoff valves for the pipeline that are capable of preventing or halting the transport of product or products to the schoolsite.

(3) Whether there are easements for planned or existing lines for the transmission or distribution of electricity, electrical transformers, or electrical substations on or in proximity to, as specified pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 17251, the schoolsite, the location of easements for, planned, or existing lines, transformers, or substations, the voltages currently handled or planned to be handled by the line, transformer, or substation, the ground clearance, if applicable, of a line, transformer, or substation, and the depth of burial, if applicable, of the line, transformer, or substation as specified by the Public Utilities Commission.

(4) The location, age, construction type, safety record, and product stored in a storage tank.

(b) A person, corporation, public utility, local publicly owned utility, or governmental agency receiving a written request for information pursuant to this section shall provide a written response within 30 calendar days of receipt of the request, that provides the requested information, identifies available public information or an available report to a governmental agency, or provides written justification why the requested information is not being provided. A claim that the requested information is proprietary or confidential is a legitimate justification for the requested information to not be provided. The governing board of a school district may grant additional time to respond to a request for information pursuant to this section.

(c) A school district may file a complaint with the appropriate regulatory agency or legislative body for a violation of the requirements of this section. The regulatory agency or legislative body may appoint a representative to work toward informally resolving the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.5.

Geological and soil engineering studies as described in Section 17212 shall be made, within the boundaries of any special studies zone, for the construction of any school building as defined in Section 17283, or if the estimated cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), for the reconstruction or alteration of or addition to any school building for work which alters structural elements. The Department of General Services may require similar geological and soil engineering studies for the construction or alteration of any school building on a site located outside of the boundaries of any special studies zone. No studies need be made if the site under consideration has been the subject of adequate prior studies.

No school building shall be constructed, reconstructed, or relocated on the trace of a geological fault along which surface rupture can reasonably be expected to occur within the life of the school building.

A copy of the report of each investigation conducted pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Department of General Services pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of this chapter and to the State Department of Education. The cost of geological and soil engineering studies and investigations conducted pursuant to this section may be treated as a capital expenditure. The dollar amount set forth in this section shall be increased on an annual basis, according to a construction costs inflation index recognized and selected by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.

The governing board of a school district shall not approve a project involving the acquisition of a schoolsite by a school district, unless all of the following occur:

(a) The school district, as the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067 of the Public Resources Code, determines that the property purchased or to be built upon is not any of the following:

(1) The site of a current or former hazardous waste disposal site or solid waste disposal site, unless if the site was a former solid waste disposal site, the governing board of the school district concludes that the wastes have been removed.

(2) A hazardous substance release site identified by the
 Department of Toxic Substances Control in a current list adopted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code for removal or remedial action pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A site that contains one or more pipelines, situated underground or aboveground, that carries hazardous substances, extremely hazardous substances, or hazardous wastes, unless the pipeline is a natural gas line that is used only to supply natural gas to that school or neighborhood.

(b) The school district, as the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067 of the Public Resources Code, in preparing the environmental impact report or negative declaration has consulted with the administering agency in which the proposed schoolsite is located, pursuant to Section 2735.3 of
 Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations, and with any air pollution control district or air quality management district having jurisdiction in the area, to identify both permitted and nonpermitted facilities within that district’s authority, including, but not limited to, freeways and other busy traffic corridors, large agricultural operations, and railyards, within one-fourth of a mile of the proposed schoolsite, that might reasonably be anticipated to emit hazardous air emissions, or to handle hazardous or extremely hazardous materials, substances, or waste. The school district, as the lead agency, shall include a list of the locations for which information is sought.

(c) The governing board of the school district makes one of the following written findings:

(1) Consultation identified none of the facilities or significant pollution sources specified in subdivision
 (b).

(2) The facilities or other pollution sources specified in subdivision (b) exist, but one of the following conditions applies:

(A) The health risks from the facilities or other pollution sources do not and will not constitute an actual or potential endangerment of public health to persons who would attend or be employed at the school.

(B) The governing board finds that corrective measures required under an existing order by another governmental entity that has jurisdiction over the facilities or other pollution sources will, before the school is occupied, result in the mitigation of all chronic or accidental hazardous air emissions to levels that do not constitute an actual or potential endangerment of public health to persons who would attend or be employed at the proposed school. If the governing board makes
 this finding, the governing board shall also make a subsequent finding, prior to the occupancy of the school, that the emissions have been mitigated to these levels.

(C) For a schoolsite with a boundary that is within 500 feet of the edge of the closest traffic lane of a freeway or other busy traffic corridor, the governing board of the school district determines, through analysis pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 44360 of the Health and Safety Code, based on appropriate air dispersion modeling, and after considering any potential mitigation measures, that the air quality at the proposed site is such that neither short-term nor long-term exposure poses significant health risks to pupils.

(D) The governing board finds that neither of the conditions set forth in subparagraph (B) or (C) can be met, and the school district is unable to locate an alternative site
 that is suitable due to a severe shortage of sites that meet the requirements in subdivision (a). If the governing board makes this finding, the governing board shall adopt a statement of overriding considerations pursuant to Section 15093 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Hazardous air emissions” means emissions into the ambient air of air contaminants that have been identified as a toxic air contaminant by the State Air Resources Board or by the air pollution control officer for the jurisdiction in which the project is located. As determined by the air pollution control officer, hazardous air emissions also means emissions into the ambient air from any substance identified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 44321 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Hazardous substance” means any substance defined in subdivision (a) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Extremely hazardous substances” means any material defined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Hazardous waste” means any waste defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Hazardous waste disposal site” means any site defined in Section 25114 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) “Administering agency” means any agency designated pursuant to Section 25502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) “Handle” means handle as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter
 6.95 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) “Facilities” means any source with a potential to use, generate, emit, or discharge hazardous air pollutants, including, but not limited to, pollutants that meet the definition of a hazardous substance, and whose process or operation is identified as an emission source pursuant to the most recent list of source categories published by the State Air Resources Board.

(9) “Freeway or other busy traffic corridors” means those roadways that, on an average day, have traffic in excess of 50,000 vehicles in a rural area, as defined in Section 50101 of the Health and Safety Code, and 100,000 vehicles in an urban area, as defined in Section 50104.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 12.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.1.

As a condition of receiving state funding pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), the governing board of a school district shall comply with subdivision (a), and is not required to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 17213, prior to the acquisition of a schoolsite, or if the school district owns or leases a schoolsite, prior to the construction of a project.

(a) Prior to acquiring a schoolsite, the governing board shall contract with an environmental assessor to supervise the preparation of, and sign, a Phase I environmental assessment of the proposed schoolsite unless the governing board decides to proceed directly to a preliminary endangerment assessment, in which case it shall comply with paragraph (4).

(1) The Phase I environmental assessment shall contain one of the following recommendations:

(A) A further investigation of the site is not required.

(B) A preliminary endangerment assessment is needed, including sampling or testing, to determine the following:

(i) If a release of hazardous material has occurred and, if so, the extent of the release.

(ii) If there is the threat of a release of hazardous materials.

(iii) If a naturally occurring hazardous material is present.

(2) If the Phase I environmental assessment concludes that further investigation of the
 site is not required, the signed assessment, proof that the environmental assessor meets the qualifications specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17210, and the renewal fee shall be submitted to the Department of Toxic Substances Control. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall conduct its review and approval, within 30 calendar days of its receipt of that assessment, proof of qualifications, and the renewal fee. In those instances in which the Department of Toxic Substances Control requests additional information after receipt of the Phase I environmental assessment pursuant to paragraph (3), the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall conduct its review and approval within 30 calendar days of its receipt of the requested additional information. If the Department of Toxic Substances Control concurs with the conclusion of the Phase I environmental assessment that a further investigation of the site is not required, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall approve the Phase I
 environmental assessment and shall notify, in writing, the State Department of Education and the governing board of the school district of the approval.

(3) If the Department of Toxic Substances Control determines that the Phase I environmental assessment is not complete or disapproves the Phase I environmental assessment, the department shall inform the school district of the decision, the basis for the decision, and actions necessary to secure department approval of the Phase I environmental assessment. The school district shall take actions necessary to secure the approval of the Phase I environmental assessment, elect to conduct a preliminary endangerment assessment, or elect not to pursue the acquisition or the construction project. To facilitate completion of the Phase I environmental assessment, the information required by this paragraph may be provided by telephonic or electronic means.

(4) (A) If the Department of Toxic Substances Control concludes after its review of a Phase I environmental assessment pursuant to this section that a preliminary endangerment assessment is needed, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall notify, in writing, the State Department of Education and the governing board of the school district of that decision and the basis for that decision. The school district shall submit to the State Department of Education the Phase I environmental assessment and requested additional information, if any, that was reviewed by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to that subparagraph. Submittal of the Phase I assessment and additional information, if any, to the State Department of Education shall be prior to the State Department of Education issuance of final site or plan approvals affected by that Phase I assessment.

(B) If the Phase I environmental assessment concludes that a preliminary endangerment assessment is needed, or if the Department of Toxic Substances Control concludes after it reviews a Phase I environmental assessment pursuant to this section that a preliminary endangerment assessment is needed, the school district shall either contract with an environmental assessor to supervise the preparation of, and sign, a preliminary endangerment assessment of the proposed schoolsite and enter into an agreement with the Department of Toxic Substances Control to oversee the preparation of the preliminary endangerment assessment or elect not to pursue the acquisition or construction project. The agreement entered into with the Department of Toxic Substances Control may be entitled an “Environmental Oversight Agreement” and shall reference this paragraph. A school district may, with the concurrence of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, enter into an
 agreement with the Department of Toxic Substances Control to oversee the preparation of a preliminary endangerment assessment without first having prepared a Phase I environmental assessment. Upon request from the school district, the Director of Toxic Substances Control shall exercise its authority to designate a person to enter the site and inspect and obtain samples pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 78435) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, if the director determines that the exercise of that authority will assist in expeditiously completing the preliminary endangerment assessment. The preliminary endangerment assessment shall contain one of the following conclusions:

(i) A further investigation of the site is not required.

(ii) A release of hazardous materials has occurred, and if so, the extent of the release, that there is the
 threat of a release of hazardous materials, or that a naturally occurring hazardous material is present, or any combination thereof.

(5) The school district shall submit the preliminary endangerment assessment to the Department of Toxic Substances Control for its review and approval and to the State Department of Education for its files. The school district may entitle a document that is meant to fulfill the requirements of a preliminary endangerment assessment a “preliminary environmental assessment” and that document shall be deemed to be a preliminary endangerment assessment if it specifically refers to the statutory provisions whose requirements it intends to meet and the document meets the requirements of a preliminary endangerment assessment.

(6) At the same time a school district submits a preliminary endangerment assessment to the Department of Toxic Substances Control
 pursuant to paragraph (5), the school district shall publish a notice that the assessment has been submitted to the department in a local newspaper of general circulation, and shall post the notice in a prominent manner at the proposed schoolsite that is the subject of that notice. The notice shall state the school district’s determination to make the preliminary endangerment assessment available for public review and comment pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C):

(A) If the school district chooses to make the assessment available for public review and comment pursuant to this subparagraph, it shall offer to receive written comments for a period of at least 30 calendar days after the assessment is submitted to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, commencing on the date the notice is originally published, and shall hold a public hearing to receive further comments. The school district shall make all of the following documents available to
 the public upon request through the time of the public hearing:

(i) The preliminary endangerment assessment.

(ii) The changes requested by the Department of Toxic Substances Control for the preliminary endangerment assessment, if any.

(iii) Any correspondence between the school district and the Department of Toxic Substances Control that relates to the preliminary endangerment assessment.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the notice of the public hearing shall include the date and location of the public hearing, and the location where the public may review the documents described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A). If the preliminary endangerment assessment is revised or altered following the public hearing, the school district
 shall make those revisions or alterations available to the public. The school district shall transmit a copy of all public comments received by the school district on the preliminary endangerment assessment to the Department of Toxic Substances Control. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall complete its review of the preliminary endangerment assessment and public comments received thereon and shall either approve or disapprove the assessment within 30 calendar days of the close of the public review period. If the Department of Toxic Substances Control determines that it is likely to disapprove the assessment prior to its receipt of the public comments, it shall inform the school district of that determination and of any action that the school district is required to take for the Department of Toxic Substances Control to approve the assessment.

(C) If the school district chooses to make the preliminary endangerment assessment
 available for public review and comment pursuant to this subparagraph, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall complete its review of the assessment within 60 calendar days of receipt of the assessment and shall either return the assessment to the school district with comments and requested modifications or requested further assessment or concur with the adequacy of the assessment pending review of public comment. If the Department of Toxic Substances Control concurs with the adequacy of the assessment, and the school district proposes to proceed with site acquisition or a construction project, the school district shall make the assessment available to the public on the same basis and at the same time it makes available the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) for the site, unless the document developed pursuant to the California Environmental Quality
 Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) will not be made available until more than 90 days after the assessment is approved, in which case the school district shall, within 60 days of the approval of the assessment, separately publish a notice of the availability of the assessment for public review in a local newspaper of general circulation. The school district shall hold a public hearing on the preliminary endangerment assessment and the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration at the same time, pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). All public comments pertaining to the preliminary endangerment assessment shall be forwarded to the Department of Toxic Substances Control immediately. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall review the public comments forwarded by the school district and shall approve or disapprove the preliminary endangerment assessment
 within 30 days of the district’s approval action of the environmental impact report or the negative declaration.

(7) The school district shall comply with the public participation requirements of Sections 78930, 78935, and 78950 to 78970, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code and other applicable provisions of the state act with respect to those response actions only if further response actions beyond a preliminary endangerment assessment are required and the district determines that it will proceed with the acquisition or construction project.

(8) If the Department of Toxic Substances Control disapproves the preliminary endangerment assessment, it shall inform the district of the decision, the basis for the decision, and actions necessary to secure the Department of Toxic Substances Control approval of the assessment. The school district shall take actions necessary to secure
 the approval of the Department of Toxic Substances Control of the preliminary endangerment assessment or elect not to pursue the acquisition or construction project.

(9) If the preliminary endangerment assessment determines that a further investigation of the site is not required and the Department of Toxic Substances Control approves this determination, it shall notify the State Department of Education and the school district of its approval. The school district may then proceed with the acquisition or construction project.

(10) If the preliminary endangerment assessment determines that a release of hazardous material has occurred, that there is the threat of a release of hazardous materials, that a naturally occurring hazardous material is present, or any combination thereof, that requires further investigation, and the Department of Toxic Substances Control approves this
 determination, the school district may elect not to pursue the acquisition or construction project. If the school district elects to pursue the acquisition or construction project, it shall do all of the following:

(A) Prepare a financial analysis that estimates the cost of response action that will be required at the proposed schoolsite.

(B) Assess the benefits that accrue from using the proposed schoolsite when compared to the use of alternative schoolsites, if any.

(C) Obtain the approval of the State Department of Education that the proposed schoolsite meets the schoolsite selection standards adopted by the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17251.

(D) Evaluate the suitability of the proposed schoolsite in light of
 the recommended alternative schoolsite locations in order of merit if the school district has requested the assistance of the State Department of Education, based upon the standards of the State Department of Education, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17251.

(11) The school district shall reimburse the Department of Toxic Substances Control for all of the department’s response costs.

(b) The costs incurred by the school districts when complying with this section are allowable costs for purposes of an applicant under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 and may be reimbursed in accordance with Section 17072.13.

(c) A school district that releases a Phase I environmental assessment, a preliminary endangerment assessment, or information concerning either of these assessments, any of which is
 required by this section, may not be held liable in any action filed against the school district for making either of these assessments available for public review.

(d) The changes made to this section by the act amending this section during the 2001 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session do not apply to a schoolsite acquisition project or a school construction project, if either of the following occurred on or before the effective date of the act amending this section during the 2001 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session:

(1) The final preliminary endangerment assessment for the project was approved by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to this section as this section read on the date of the approval.

(2) The school district seeking state funding for the project completed a public hearing for the
 project pursuant to this section, as this section read on the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 13.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.2.

As a condition of receiving state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), all of the following apply:

(a) If a preliminary endangerment assessment prepared pursuant to Section 17213.1 discloses the presence of a hazardous materials release, or threatened release, or the presence of naturally occurring hazardous materials, at a proposed schoolsite at concentrations that could pose a significant risk to children or adults, and the school district owns the proposed schoolsite, the school district shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Toxic Substances Control to oversee response action at the site and shall take response action pursuant to the requirements of the state act as may be required by the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district need not take action in response to a release of hazardous material to groundwater underlying the schoolsite if the release occurred at a site other than the schoolsite and if the following conditions apply:

(1) The school district did not cause or contribute to the release of a hazardous material to the groundwater.

(2) Upon the request of the Department of Toxic Substances Control or its authorized representative the school district provides the Department of Toxic Substances Control or its authorized representative with access to the schoolsite.

(3) The school district does not interfere with the response action activities.

(c) If at anytime during the response action the school district determines that there has been a significant increase in the estimated cost of the response action, the school district shall notify the State Department of Education.

(d) A school district that is required by the Department of Toxic Substances Control to take response action at a proposed schoolsite is subject to both of the following prohibitions:

(1) The school district may not begin construction of a school building until the Department of Toxic Substances Control determines all of the following:

(A) That the construction will not interfere with the response action.

(B) That site conditions will not pose a significant threat to the health and safety of workers involved in the construction of the school building.

(C) That the nature and extent of any release or threatened release of hazardous materials or the presence of any naturally occurring hazardous materials have been fully characterized.

(2) The school district may not occupy a school building following construction until it obtains from the Department of Toxic Substances Control a certification that all response actions, except for operation and maintenance activities, necessary to ensure that hazardous materials at the schoolsite no longer pose a significant risk to children and adults at the schoolsite have been completed and that the response action standards and objectives established in the final removal action work plan or remedial action plan have been met and are being maintained. After a school building is constructed and occupied, a school district may continue with ongoing operation and maintenance activities if the Department of Toxic Substances Control certifies before occupancy that neither site conditions nor the ongoing operation and maintenance activities pose a significant risk to children or adults at the schoolsite.

(e) If, at anytime during construction at a schoolsite, a previously unidentified release or threatened release of a hazardous material or the presence of a naturally occurring hazardous material is discovered, the school district shall cease all construction activities at the sites notify the Department of Toxic Substances Control, and take actions required by subdivision (a) that are necessary to address the release or threatened release or the presence of any naturally occurring hazardous materials. Construction may be resumed if the Department of Toxic Substances Control determines that the construction will not interfere with any response action necessary to address the hazardous material release or threatened release or the presence of a naturally occurring hazardous material, determines that the site conditions will not pose a significant threat to the health and safety of workers involved in the construction of the schoolsite, and certifies that the nature and extent of the release, threatened release, or presence of a naturally occurring hazardous material have been fully characterized.

(f) Construction may proceed at any portions of the site that the Department of Toxic Substances Control determines are not affected by the release or threatened release of hazardous materials, or presence of any naturally occurring hazardous materials, provided that all of the following apply:

(1) Those portions of the site have been fully characterized.

(2) The Department of Toxic Substances Control determines that the construction will not interfere with any response action necessary to address the release or threatened release of hazardous materials, or presence of any naturally occurring hazardous materials.

(3) The site conditions will not pose a significant threat to the health and safety of workers involved with construction.

(g) The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall notify the State Department of Education, the Division of the State Architect, and the Office of Public School Construction when the Department of Toxic Substances Control certifies that all necessary response actions have been completed at a schoolsite. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall also notify the Division of the State Architect whenever a response action has an impact on the design of a school facility and shall specify the conditions that must be met in the design of the school facility in order to protect the integrity of the response action.

(h) The school district shall reimburse the Department of Toxic Substances Control for all response costs incurred by the department.

(i) The costs incurred by the school districts when complying with this section are allowable costs for purposes of an applicant under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 and may be reimbursed in accordance with Section 17072.13.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 443, Sec. 5.   Effective September 14, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.

(a) In order to promote the safety of pupils, comprehensive community planning, and greater educational usefulness of schoolsites, before acquiring title to or leasing property for a new schoolsite, the governing board of each school district, including any district governed by a city board of education, or a charter school, shall give the State Department of Education written notice of the proposed acquisition or lease and shall submit any information required by the State Department of Education if the site is within two miles, measured by air line, of that point on an airport runway or a potential runway included in an airport master plan that is nearest to the site.

(b) Upon receipt of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (a), the State Department of Education shall notify the Department of Transportation in writing of the proposed acquisition or lease. If the Department of Transportation is no longer in operation, the State Department of Education shall, in lieu of notifying the Department of Transportation, notify the United States Department of Transportation or any other appropriate agency, in writing, of the proposed acquisition or lease for the purpose of obtaining from the department or other agency any information or assistance that it may desire to give.

(c) The Department of Transportation shall investigate the site and, within 30 working days after receipt of the notice, shall submit to the State Department of Education a written report of its findings including recommendations concerning acquisition or lease of the site. As part of the investigation, the Department of Transportation shall give notice thereof to the owner and operator of the airport who shall be granted the opportunity to comment upon the site. The Department of Transportation shall adopt regulations setting forth the criteria by which a site will be evaluated pursuant to this section.

(d) The State Department of Education shall, within 10 days of receiving the Department of Transportation’s report, forward the report to the governing board of the school district or charter school. The governing board or charter school may not acquire title to or lease the property until the report of the Department of Transportation has been received. If the report does not favor the acquisition or lease of the property for a schoolsite or an addition to a present schoolsite, the governing board or charter school may not acquire title to or lease the property. If the report does favor the acquisition or lease of the property for a schoolsite or an addition to a present schoolsite, the governing board or charter school shall hold a public hearing on the matter prior to acquiring or leasing the site.

(e) If the Department of Transportation’s recommendation does not favor acquisition or lease of the proposed site, state funds or local funds may not be apportioned or expended for the acquisition or lease of that site, construction of any school building on that site, or for the expansion of any existing site to include that site.

(f) This section does not apply to sites acquired prior to January 1, 1966, nor to any additions or extensions to those sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.5.

(a) Prior to commencing the acquisition of real property for a new schoolsite in an area designated in a city, county, or city and county general plan for agricultural use and zoned for agricultural production, the governing board of a school district shall make all of the following findings:

(1) The school district has notified and consulted with the city, county, or city and county within which the prospective schoolsite is to be located.

(2) The final site selection has been evaluated by the governing board of the school district based on all factors affecting the public interest and not limited to selection on the basis of the cost of the land.

(3) The school district will attempt to minimize any public health and safety issues resulting from the neighboring agricultural uses that may affect the pupils and employees at the schoolsite.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any schoolsite approved by the State Department of Education prior to January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 39006 by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17216.

No action undertaken by the State Department of Education or by any other state agency or by any political subdivision pursuant to this chapter, or in compliance with this chapter, shall be construed to affect any rights arising under the provisions of Section 19 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17217.

(a) The governing board of a school district may acquire a site for a school building contiguous to the boundaries of the district and upon the acquisition of the site it shall become a part of the district. 

(b) The site may not be acquired until all of the following conditions are met:

(1) A majority of the members of the governing board of the acquiring school district approves a petition requesting approval of the acquisition.

(2) The petition is filed with the county superintendent of schools with jurisdiction over the acquiring school district. If the site is in a county that is not the county in which the acquiring school district is located, the petition shall be filed with each of the county superintendents of the counties concerned. Within 10 working days of the date the petition is filed, each superintendent of schools of those counties shall notify the governing board of each school district involved that the petition was filed.

(3) The county committee on school district organization of the county of the acquiring school district approves the petition. If the site is in a county that is not the county in which the acquiring school district is located, each of the county committees on school district organization concerned shall approve the petition. The county committees on school district organization shall approve or disapprove a petition within 60 days from the day the governing board filed the petition with the county superintendent of schools.
